Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska61-212
Water divisions; denomination.

The State of Nebraska is hereby divided into two water divisions, denominated water division No. 1 and water division No. 2, respectively.

Laws 1895, c. 69, § 1, p. 244;

R.S.1913, § 3378;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 1, § 10, p. 833;

C.S.1922, § 8415;

C.S.1929, § 46-510;

R.S.1943, § 46-215;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-215;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 12.

For administrative purposes, state is divided into two water divisions. Ainsworth Irr. Dist. v. Bejot, 170 Neb. 257, 102 N.W.2d 416 (1960).